Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 2

Voting

48-57-201. Members' list for meeting.

After fixing a record date for a notice of a meeting, a corporation shall prepare an alphabetical list of the names of all its members who are entitled to notice of a meeting. The list must show the address and number of votes each member is entitled to vote at the meeting. The corporation shall prepare on a current basis through the time of the membership meeting a list of members, if any, who are entitled to vote at the meeting, but not entitled to notice of the meeting. This list shall be prepared on the same basis and be part of the list of members.

The list of members must be available for inspection by any member for the purpose of communication with other members concerning the meeting, beginning two (2) business days after notice is given of the meeting for which the list was prepared and continuing through the meeting, at the corporation's principal office or at a reasonable place identified in the meeting notice in the city where the meeting will be held. A member, a member's agent, or attorney is entitled on written demand to inspect and, subject to the limitations of §§ 48-66-102(c) and 48-66-105, to copy the list, at a reasonable time and at the member's expense, during the period it is available for inspection.

The corporation shall make the list of members available at the meeting, and any member, a member's agent, or attorney is entitled to inspect the list at any time during the meeting or any adjournment.

If the corporation refuses to allow a member, a member's agent, or attorney to inspect the list of members before or at the meeting (or copy the list as permitted by subsection (b)), a court of record having equity jurisdiction in the county where a corporation's principal office (or if none in this state, its registered office) is located, on application of the member, may summarily order the inspection or copying at the corporation's expense and may postpone the meeting for which the list was prepared until the inspection or copying is complete.

Refusal or failure to make available the members' list does not affect the validity of action taken at the meeting.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.20.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 7 Tenn. Juris., Corporations, § 44.

48-57-202. Voting entitlement generally.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, each member is entitled to one (1) vote on each matter voted on by the members.

Unless the charter or bylaws provide otherwise, if a membership stands of record in the names of two (2) or more persons, their acts with respect to voting shall have the following effect:

If only one (1) vote, such act binds all; and

If more than one (1) vote, the vote shall be divided on a pro rata basis.

Memberships standing in the name of another nonprofit or for-profit corporation, domestic or foreign, may be voted by such officer, agent or proxy as the bylaws of such corporation may prescribe or, in the absence of a bylaw provision, as the board of directors of such corporation may determine. The corporation whose membership is being voted may rely on the representations of such officer, agent, or proxy as to the authority unless such authority is questioned.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.21.

48-57-203. Quorum requirements.

Unless chapters 51-68 of this title or the charter or bylaws provide for a higher or lower quorum, ten percent (10%) of the votes entitled to be cast on a matter must be represented at a meeting of members to constitute a quorum on that matter.

An amendment to the charter or bylaws that adds, changes, or deletes a greater quorum or voting requirement shall meet the same quorum requirement in subsection (a) and be adopted by the same vote and voting groups required to take action under the quorum and voting requirements then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

When a quorum is once present to organize a meeting, a meeting may be adjourned despite the absence of a quorum caused by the subsequent withdrawal of any of those present.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.22; 2014, ch. 899, §§ 24, 25.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-204. Voting requirements.

If a quorum exists, action on a matter by a voting group is approved if the votes cast within the voting group favoring the action exceed the votes cast opposing the action, unless the charter, bylaws or chapters 51-68 of this title require a greater number of affirmative votes.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.23; 2014, ch. 899, § 26.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-205. Proxies.

Unless the charter or bylaws prohibit or limit proxy voting, a member may vote in person or by proxy.

Without limiting the manner in which a member may authorize another person or persons to act for the member as proxy pursuant to this section, the following shall constitute a valid means by which a member may grant such authority:

A member may execute a writing authorizing another person or persons to act for the member as proxy. Execution may be accomplished by the member personally signing such writing or by an attorney-in-fact in the case of an individual member or by an authorized officer, director, employee, agent or attorney-in-fact in the case of any other member signing such writing or causing the member's signature to be affixed to such writing by any reasonable means, including, but not limited to, facsimile signature;

A member may authorize another person or persons to act for the member as proxy by transmitting or authorizing the transmission of a telegram, cablegram, or electronic transmission to the person who will be the holder of the proxy or to a proxy solicitation firm, proxy support service organization or like agent duly authorized by the person who will be the holder of the proxy to receive such transmission; provided, that any such telegram, cablegram, or electronic transmission shall either set forth or be submitted with information from which it can be determined that the telegram, cablegram, or electronic transmission was authorized by the member. If it is determined that such telegrams, cablegrams, or electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making such determination shall specify the information upon which they relied;

Any copy, electronic transmission or other reliable reproduction of such writing or transmission may be substituted or used in lieu of the original writing or transmission for any and all purposes for which the original writing or transmission could be used; provided, that such copy, electronic transmission or other reproduction shall be a complete reproduction of the entire original writing or transmission.

An appointment of a proxy is effective when received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes. An appointment is valid for eleven (11) months unless another period is expressly provided in the appointment form.

An appointment of a proxy is revocable by the member unless the appointment form conspicuously states that it is irrevocable and the appointment is coupled with an interest. Appointments coupled with an interest include the appointment of:

A pledgee;

A person who purchased or agreed to purchase the membership;

A creditor of the corporation who extended it credit under terms requiring the appointment;

An employee of the corporation whose employment contract requires the appointment; or

A party to a voting agreement created under § 48-57-301.

In the case of a proxy not made irrevocable under subsection (d), the death or incapacity of the member appointing a proxy does not affect the right of the corporation to accept the proxy's authority unless notice of the death or incapacity is received by the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes before the proxy exercises the proxy's authority under the appointment.

An appointment made irrevocable under subsection (d) becomes revocable when the interest with which it is coupled is extinguished.

A transferee for value of the membership subject to an irrevocable appointment may revoke the appointment if the transferee did not know of its existence when such transferee acquired the membership, and the existence of the irrevocable appointment was not noted conspicuously on the document or documents representing the membership or the right to transfer the membership.

Subject to § 48-57-208 and to any express limitation on the proxy's authority appearing on the face of the appointment form, a corporation is entitled to accept the proxy's vote or other action as that of the member making the appointment.

Each fiduciary, including such acting as executor, administrator, guardian, committee, agent, or trustee, owning memberships registered in such person's name as fiduciary, or in the name of another for the convenience of the fiduciary, whether the corporation issuing such memberships is foreign or domestic, may, in addition to exercising the voting rights vested in such fiduciary, execute and deliver, or cause to be executed and delivered, a proxy or proxies in accordance with this section to others for the voting of such memberships, but subject always to the following limitations:

If there are two (2) or more fiduciaries acting, the proxy shall be executed by, and voting instructions shall be issued by, agreement of all fiduciaries or a majority of them, and in the event of failure to obtain a majority, each of the fiduciaries shall vote the number of memberships held by the fiduciaries divided by the number of fiduciaries; and

In the event the rights, manner or method of voting or the purpose to be accomplished is fixed by the instrument or instruments appointing the fiduciaries, the directions therein shall govern.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.24; 2014, ch. 899, § 27.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 5-2501 — 5-2503.

48-57-206. Voting for directors — Cumulative voting.

Unless otherwise provided in the charter or the bylaws, directors are elected by a plurality of the votes cast by the members entitled to vote in the election at a meeting at which a quorum is present.

Members do not have a right to cumulate their votes for directors unless the charter or the bylaws so provide.

If the charter or the bylaws provide for cumulative voting by members, members may so vote, by multiplying the number of votes they are entitled to cast by the number of directors for whom they are entitled to vote, and cast the product for a single candidate or distribute the product among two (2) or more candidates.

Members otherwise entitled to vote cumulatively may not vote cumulatively at a particular meeting unless:

The meeting notice or statement accompanying the notice states conspicuously that cumulative voting is authorized; or

A member who has the right to cumulate the member's votes gives notice during the meeting and before the vote is taken of the member's intent to cumulate votes, and if one (1) member gives this notice, all other members participating in the election are entitled to cumulate their votes without giving further notice.

Members may not cumulatively vote if the directors and members are identical.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.25.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-207. Other methods of electing directors.

A corporation may provide in its charter or bylaws for election of directors by members or delegates:

On the basis of chapter or other organizational unit;

By region or other geographic unit;

By preferential voting; or

By any other reasonable method.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.26.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-208. Corporation's acceptance of votes.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment corresponds to the name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member.

If the name signed on a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment does not correspond to the record name of a member, the corporation if acting in good faith is nevertheless entitled to accept the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment and give it effect as the act of the member if:

The member is an entity and the name signed purports to be that of an officer or agent of the entity;

The name signed purports to be that of an administrator, executor, guardian, or conservator representing the member and, if the corporation requests, evidence of fiduciary status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a receiver or trustee in bankruptcy of the member, and, if the corporation requests, evidence of this status acceptable to the corporation has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment;

The name signed purports to be that of a pledgee, beneficial owner, or attorney-in-fact of the member and, if the corporation requests, evidence acceptable to the corporation of the signatory's authority to sign for the member has been presented with respect to the vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment; or

Two (2) or more persons hold the membership as cotenants or fiduciaries and the name signed purports to be the name of at least one (1) of the coholders and the person signing appears to be acting on behalf of all the coholders.

The corporation is entitled to reject a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment if the secretary or other officer or agent authorized to tabulate votes, acting in good faith, has a reasonable basis for doubt about the validity of the signature or about the signatory's authority to sign for the member.

The corporation and its officer or agent who accepts or rejects a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment in good faith and in accordance with the standards of this section are not liable in damages to the member for the consequences of the acceptance or rejection.

Corporate action based on the acceptance or rejection of a vote, consent, waiver, or proxy appointment under this section is valid unless a court of competent jurisdiction determines otherwise.

The grounds for acceptance of votes set out in subsection (b) do not constitute the exclusive basis on which a corporation may accept votes.

Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 7.27.

Cross-References. Inapplicability of Nonprofit Corporation Act to certain rural electric and community services cooperatives, § 65-25-125.

48-57-209. Inspectors.

A corporation with members may appoint one (1) or more inspectors to act at a meeting of members and make a report in the form of a document of the inspectors' determinations. Each inspector shall execute the duties of inspector impartially and according to the best of the inspector's ability.

The inspectors shall:

Ascertain the number of members and their voting power;

Determine the members present at a meeting;

Determine the validity of proxies and ballots;

Count all votes; and

Determine the result.

An inspector may, but need not, be a director, member, officer, or employee of the membership corporation. A person who is a candidate for office to be filled at the meeting shall not be an inspector.

Acts 2014, ch. 899, § 28.